California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(2) A compilation of a financial statement when that person expects, or reasonably might expect, that a third party will use the financial statement and the compilation report does not disclose a lack of independence.

(3) An examination of prospective financial information.

For purposes of this subdivision, “director” means any person as defined under Section 164 of the Corporations Code and “officer” means any individual reported to a regulatory agency as an officer of a corporation. However, “director” and “officer” does not include a director or officer of a nonprofit corporation, or a corporation that meets the board’s definition of small business, as specified by regulation.

(d) A person engaged in the practice of public accountancy who is not prohibited from performing services for a commission, or from receiving a commission, and who is paid or expects to be paid a commission, shall disclose that fact to any client or entity to whom the person engaged in the practice of public accountancy recommends or refers a product or service to which the commission relates.

(e) The board shall adopt regulations to implement, interpret, and make specific the provisions of this section including, but not limited to, regulations specifying the terms of any disclosure required by subdivision (d), the manner in which the disclosure shall be made, and other matters regarding the disclosure that the board deems appropriate. These regulations shall require, at a minimum, that a disclosure shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Be in writing and be clear and conspicuous.

(2) Be signed by the recipient of the product or service.

(3) State the amount of the commission or the basis on which it will be computed.

(4) Identify the source of the payment and the relationship between the source of the payment and the person receiving the payment.

(5) Be presented to the client at or prior to the time the recommendation of the product or service is made.

(f) For purposes of this section, “fee” includes, but is not limited to, a commission, rebate, preference, discount, or other consideration, whether in the form of money or otherwise.

(g) This section shall not prohibit payments for the purchase of any accounting practice or retirement payments to individuals presently or formerly engaged in the practice of public accountancy or payments to their heirs or estates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 807, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.

A licensee shall issue a report which conforms to professional standards upon completion of a compilation, review or audit of financial statements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1393, Sec. 1.3.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.2.

A licensee shall not accept employment with a publicly traded corporation or its affiliate within 12 months of the date of issuance of a financial statement report if both of the following criteria are met:

(a) The licensee has participated in an audit engagement for the corporation and held responsibility, with respect to the audit engagement, requiring the licensee to exercise significant judgment in the audit process. Responsibilities meeting the requirements of this subdivision include, but are not limited to, positions, however titled, where the licensee was the person in charge of the fieldwork, up through positions where the licensee was a partner on the engagement.

(b) The employment would permit the licensee to exercise significant authority over accounting or financial reporting, including authority over the controls related to those functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 232, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.3.

For purposes of an enforcement action taken by the board, an accounting firm providing attestation services where none of the licensee owners of the firm have authority to sign reports on attest engagements, the licensee owners shall be held to the same level of responsibility as the licensee or licensees who performed the engagement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 586, Sec. 7.   (AB 3251)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.4.

If a licensee is no longer employed with an accounting firm, the accounting firm shall make all working papers available to a licensee who signed a report on an attest engagement upon request by the board for purposes of conducting an investigation. The licensee shall return the working papers upon direction by the board and shall keep no copies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 586, Sec. 8.   (AB 3251)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.

(a) A licensee shall report to the board in writing of the occurrence of any of the following events occurring on or after January 1, 1997, within 30 days of the date the licensee has knowledge of these events:

(1) The conviction of the licensee of any of the following:

(A) A felony.

(B) Any crime related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a public accountant or certified public accountant, or to acts or activities in the course and scope of the practice of public accountancy.

(C) Any crime involving theft, embezzlement, misappropriation of funds or property, breach of a fiduciary responsibility, or the preparation, publication, or dissemination of false, fraudulent, or materially misleading financial statements, reports, or information.

As used in this section, a conviction includes the initial plea, verdict, or finding of guilt, pleas of no contest, or pronouncement of sentence by a trial court even though that conviction may not be final or sentence actually imposed until appeals are exhausted.

(2) The cancellation, revocation, or suspension of a certificate, other authority to practice or refusal to renew a certificate or other authority to practice as a certified public accountant or a public accountant, by any other state or foreign country.

(3) The cancellation, revocation, or suspension of the right to practice as a certified public accountant or a public accountant before any governmental body or agency.

(b) A licensee shall report to the board in writing the occurrence of any of the following events occurring on or after January 1, 2003, within 30 days of the date the licensee has knowledge of the events:

(1) Any restatement of a financial statement and related disclosures by a client audited by the licensee.

(2) Any civil action settlement or arbitration award against the licensee relating to the practice of public accountancy where the amount or value of the settlement or arbitration award is thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or greater and where the licensee is not insured for the full amount of the award.

(3) Any notice of the opening or initiation of a formal investigation of the licensee by the Securities and Exchange Commission or its designee.

(4) Any notice from the Securities and Exchange Commission to a licensee requesting a Wells Submission.

(5) Any notice of the opening or initiation of an investigation by the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board or its designee, as defined pursuant to subdivision (g).

(c) A licensee shall report to the board in writing, within 30 days of the entry of the judgment, any judgment entered on or after January 1, 2003, against the licensee in any civil action alleging any of the following:

(1) Dishonesty, fraud, gross negligence, or negligence.

(2) Breach of fiduciary responsibility.

(3) Preparation, publication, or dissemination of false, fraudulent, or materially misleading financial statements, reports, or information.

(4) Embezzlement, theft, misappropriation of funds or property, or obtaining money, property, or other valuable consideration by fraudulent means or false pretenses, or other errors or omissions.

(5) Any actionable conduct by the licensee in the practice of public accountancy, the performance of bookkeeping operations, or other professional practice.

(d) The report required by subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall be signed by the licensee and set forth the facts which constitute the reportable event. If the reportable event involves the action of an administrative agency or court, then the report shall set forth the title of the matter, court or agency name, docket number, and dates of occurrence of the reportable event.

(e) A licensee shall promptly respond to oral or written inquiries from the board concerning the reportable events, including inquiries made by the board in conjunction with license renewal.

(f) Nothing in this section shall impose a duty upon any licensee to report to the board the occurrence of any of the events set forth in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) either by or against any other licensee.

(g) The board may adopt regulations to further define the reporting requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 231, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.1.

Within 10 days of entry of a conviction described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5063 or a judgment described in subdivision (c) of Section 5063 by a court of this state, the court that rendered the conviction or judgment shall report that fact to the board and provide the board with a copy of the conviction or judgment and any orders or opinions of the court accompanying or ordering the conviction or judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 231, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.2.

Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of any civil action settlement or arbitration award against a licensee of the board in which the amount or value of the settlement or arbitration award is thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or greater, any insurer or licensed surplus broker providing professional liability insurance to that licensee shall report to the board the name of the licensee, the amount or value of the settlement or arbitration award, the amount paid by the insurer or licensed surplus broker, and the identity of the payee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 231, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.3.

(a) No confidential information obtained by a licensee, in their professional capacity, concerning a client or a prospective client shall be disclosed by the licensee without the written permission of the client or prospective client, except the following:

(1) Disclosures made by a licensee in compliance with a subpoena or a summons enforceable by order of a court.

(2) Disclosures made by a licensee regarding a client or prospective client to the extent the licensee reasonably believes it is necessary to maintain or defend themselves in a legal proceeding initiated by the client or prospective client.

(3) Disclosures made by a licensee
 in response to an official inquiry from a federal or state government regulatory agency.

(4) Disclosures made by a licensee or a licensee’s duly authorized representative to another licensee or person in connection with a proposed sale or merger of the licensee’s professional practice, provided the parties enter into a written nondisclosure agreement with regard to all client information shared between the parties.

(5) Disclosures made by a licensee to either of the following:

(A) Another licensee to the extent necessary for purposes of professional consultation.

(B) Organizations that provide professional standards review and ethics or quality control peer review.

(6) Disclosures made
 when specifically required by law.

(7) Disclosures specified by the board in regulation.

(b) In the event that confidential client information may be disclosed to persons or entities outside the United States of America in connection with the services provided, the licensee shall inform the client in writing and obtain the client’s written permission for the disclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 74.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.10.

(a) Any restatement of a financial statement that is included in any report filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission shall be exempt from the requirement described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5063.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the reporting of any restatement of a financial statement that is not required to be submitted to the board pursuant to the regulations adopted by the board in effect on the date this section becomes operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 448, Sec. 7.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Applications, Registrations, Permits Generally [5070. - 5079.]

5070.

(a) Permits to engage in the practice of public accountancy in this state shall be issued by the board only to holders of the certificate of certified public accountant issued under this chapter and to those partnerships, corporations, and other persons who, upon application approved by the board, are registered with the board under this chapter. Notwithstanding any other law, the board may register an entity organized and authorized to practice public accountancy under the laws of another state for the purpose of allowing that entity to satisfy the registration requirement set forth in Section 5096.12, if (1) the certified public accountants providing services in California qualify for the practice privilege, and (2) the entity satisfies all
 other requirements to register in this state, other than its form of legal organization.

(b) All applicants for registration shall furnish satisfactory evidence that the applicant is entitled to registration and shall pay the fee as provided in Article 8 (commencing with Section 5130). Every partnership, corporation, and other person to whom a permit is issued shall, in addition to any other fee that may be payable, pay the initial permit fee provided in Article 8 (commencing with Section 5130).

(c) Each applicant who has a valid email address shall report to the board that email address at the time of application or registration.

(d) Each partnership, corporation, and other person issued a permit by the board to
 practice as a certified public accountant or as a public accountant shall be furnished with a suitable certificate evidencing that registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 300, Sec. 3.   (AB 298)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.1.

(a) The board may establish, by regulation, a system for the placement of a license into a retired status, upon application, for certified public accountants and public accountants who are not actively engaged in the practice of public accountancy or any activity that requires them to be licensed by the board.

(b) No licensee with a license in a retired status shall engage in any activity for which a permit is required.

(c) The board shall deny an applicant’s application to place a license in a retired status if the permit is subject to an outstanding order of the board, is suspended or revoked, or is subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(1) For purposes of this subdivision, a permanent restricted practice order shall not be considered an outstanding order of the board provided the licensee has completed probation as part of any original discipline order.

(2) If a license is subject to a permanent restricted practice order at the time the board approves the license to be placed in a retired status, the permanent restricted practice order shall be reinstated if the license is restored from retired status to an active status and shall remain in effect until the board modifies or terminates the permanent restricted practice order.

(d) (1) The holder of a license that was canceled pursuant to Section 5070.7 may apply for the placement of that license in a retired status pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Upon approval of an application made pursuant to paragraph (1), the board shall reissue that license in a retired status.

(3) The holder of a canceled license that was placed in retired status between January 1, 1994, and January 1, 1999, inclusive, shall not be required to meet the qualifications established pursuant to subdivision (e), but shall be subject to all other requirements of this section.

(e) The board shall establish minimum qualifications to place a license in retired status.

(f) The board may exempt the holder of a license in a retired status from the renewal requirements described in Section 5070.5.

(g) The board shall establish minimum qualifications for the restoration
 of a license in a retired status to an active status. These minimum qualifications shall include, but are not limited to, continuing education and payment of a fee as provided in subdivision (h) of Section 5134.

(h) The board shall not restore to active or inactive status a license that was canceled by operation of law, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5070.7, and then placed into retired status pursuant to subdivision (d). The individual shall instead apply for a new license, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 5070.7, in order to restore the individual’s license.

(i) At the time of application, if the applicant has a valid email address, the applicant shall provide that email address to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 9.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.2.

(a) (1) Beginning January 1, 2014, a holder of a permit may apply to have the holder’s permit placed in a military inactive status if the holder of a permit is engaged in, and provides sufficient evidence of, active duty as a member of the California National Guard or the United States Armed Forces.

(2) The board shall deny an applicant’s application for a military inactive status permit if the permit issued pursuant to Section 5070 is canceled or if it is suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter. At the time of application, if the applicant has a valid email address, the applicant shall
 provide that email address to the board.

(b) No holder of a permit in a military inactive status shall engage in any activity for which a permit is required.

(c) The holder of a permit in a military inactive status shall be exempt from all of the following:

(1) Payment of the biennial renewal fee described in Section 5134.

(2) The continuing education requirements of Section 5027.

(3) The peer review requirements of Section 5076.

(d) In order to convert a permit status from military inactive status prior to discharge from active duty as a
 member of the California National Guard or the United States Armed Forces, the holder of a permit in a military inactive status shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Pay the current biennial renewal fee described in
 Section 5134.

(2) Meet continuing education requirements as prescribed by the board.

(3) Meet the peer review requirements as prescribed by the board.

(e) The holder of a permit in a military inactive status shall, within one year from discharge from active duty as a member of the California National Guard or the United States Armed Forces, comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) Provide evidence to the board of the discharge date.

(2) Pay the current biennial renewal fee described in Section 5134.

(3) Meet
 continuing education requirements as prescribed by the board.

(4) Meet the peer review requirements as prescribed by the board.

(f) The board may adopt regulations as necessary to administer this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 7.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.5.

(a) (1) A permit issued under this chapter to a certified public accountant or a public accountant expires at 12 midnight on the last day of the month of the legal birthday of the licensee during the second year of a two-year term if not renewed.

(2) To renew an unexpired permit, a permitholder shall, before the time at which the permit would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter, and give evidence satisfactory to the board that the permitholder has complied with the continuing education provisions of this chapter.

(3) Each
 applicant for renewal who has a valid email address shall report that email address to the board on the renewal form described in paragraph (1).

(b) A permit to practice as an accountancy partnership or an accountancy corporation expires at 12 midnight on the last day of the month in which the permit was initially issued during the second year of a two-year term if not renewed. To renew an unexpired permit, the permitholder shall, before the time at which the permit would otherwise expire, apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter, and provide evidence satisfactory to the board that the accountancy partnership or accountancy corporation is in compliance with this chapter.

(c) On or before July 1, 2020, each permitholder
 who has a valid email address shall provide that email address to the board.

(d) A permitholder shall notify the board within 30 days of any change to their email address on file with the board. The board may periodically, as it determines necessary, require permitholders to confirm that their email address on file with the board is current.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 300, Sec. 4.   (AB 298)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.6.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an expired permit may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration upon the filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees and providing evidence satisfactory to the board of compliance as required by Section 5070.5. At the time of application, if the applicant has a valid email address, the applicant shall provide that address to the board. If the permit is renewed after its expiration, its holder, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this chapter. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which the accrued renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the
 delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the permit shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 5070.5 that next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 359, Sec. 9.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.7.

(a) A permit that is not renewed within five years following its expiration may not be renewed, restored, or reinstated thereafter, and the certificate of the holder of the permit shall be canceled immediately upon expiration of the five-year period, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(b) A partnership or corporation whose certificate has been canceled by operation of this section may obtain a new certificate and permit only if it again meets the requirements set forth in this chapter relating to registration and pays the registration fee and initial permit fee.

(c) A certified public accountant whose certificate is canceled by operation of this section may
 apply for and obtain a new certificate and permit if the applicant:

(1) Is not subject to denial of a certificate and permit under Section 480.

(2) Pays all of the fees that would be required of them if they were then applying for the certificate and permit for the first time.

(3) Takes and passes the examination that would be required of them if they were then applying for the certificate for the first time. The examination may be waived in any case in which the applicant establishes to the satisfaction of the board that, with due regard for the public interest, they are qualified to engage in practice as a certified public accountant.

(d) The board may, by appropriate regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of all or any part of the application
 fee in those cases in which a certificate is issued without an examination under this section.

(e) Revoked permits may not be renewed, but may be reinstated by the board, without regard to the length of time that has elapsed since the permit was revoked, and with conditions and restrictions as the board shall determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 75.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.8.

A permit which has been suspended is subject to expiration, and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the holder of the permit, while it remains suspended, and until it is reinstated, to engage in the practice of accountancy, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the permit was suspended.

A permit which has been revoked is subject to expiration, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the holder of the permit, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee which shall be in an amount equal
 to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1254.)
-------------------------------------------

5072.

(a) No persons shall engage in the practice of accountancy as a partnership unless the partnership is registered by the board.

(b) A partnership, other than a limited partnership, may be registered by the board to engage in the practice of public accountancy provided it meets the following requirements:

(1) At least one general partner shall hold a valid permit to practice as a certified public accountant, public accountant, or accountancy corporation, or shall be an applicant for a certificate as a certified public accountant under Sections 5087 and 5088, or the partnership shall be registered pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5096.12.

(2) Each partner engaged within this state in the practice of public accountancy as defined by Section 5051 shall hold a valid permit to practice in this state or shall have applied for a certificate as a certified public accountant under Sections 5087 and 5088, except for a partner with practice privileges pursuant to Section 5096.

(3) Each partner not engaged in the practice of public accountancy within this state shall be a certified public accountant in good standing of some
 state, except as permitted by Section 5079.

(4) Each resident manager in charge of an office of the firm in this state shall be a licensee in good standing of this state, or shall have applied for a certificate as a certified public accountant under Sections 5087 and 5088.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 661, Sec. 4.5) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.   (SB 795)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5073.

(a) Application for registration of a partnership shall be made upon a form prescribed by the board. At the time of registration, if the partnership has a valid email address, the partnership shall provide that email address to the board. The board shall in each case determine whether the applicant is eligible for registration.

(b) A partnership that is so registered and that holds a valid permit issued under this article and that has at least one general partner who is licensed to practice using the designation “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “C.P.A.” and one additional licensed person may use the words “certified public accountants” or the abbreviation “C.P.A.s” in connection with its partnership name.

(c) A partnership that is so registered and that holds a valid permit issued under this article and that has at least one general partner who is licensed to practice using the designation “public accountant” or the abbreviation “P.A.” and one additional licensed person may use the words “public accountants” or the abbreviation “P.A.s” in connection with its partnership name.

(d) Notification shall be given to the board within one month after the admission to, or withdrawal of, a partner from any partnership so registered.

(e) Any registration of a partnership under this section granted in reliance upon Sections 5087 and 5088 shall terminate forthwith if the board rejects the application under Sections 5087 and 5088 of the general partner who signed the application for registration as a partnership, or any partner
 personally engaged in the practice of public accountancy in this state, or any resident manager of a partnership in charge of an office in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 359, Sec. 10.   (AB 1521)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5076.

(a) In order to renew its registration in an active status or convert to an active status, a firm, as defined in Section 5035.1, shall have a peer review report of its accounting and auditing practice accepted by a board-recognized peer review program no less frequently than every three years.

(b) For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Peer review” means a study, appraisal, or review conducted in accordance with professional standards of the professional work of a firm, and may include an evaluation of other factors in accordance with the requirements specified by the board in regulations. The peer review report shall be issued by an individual who has a valid and
 current license, certificate, or permit to practice public accountancy from this state or another state and is unaffiliated with the firm being reviewed.

(2) “Accounting and auditing practice” includes any services that were performed in the prior three years using professional standards defined by the board in regulations.

(c) The board shall adopt regulations as necessary to implement, interpret, and make specific the peer review requirements in this section, including, but not limited to, regulations specifying the requirements for board recognition of a peer review program, standards for administering a peer review, extensions of time for fulfilling the peer review requirement, exclusions from the peer review program, and document submission.

(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the board from initiating an
 investigation and imposing discipline against a firm or licensee, either as the result of a complaint that alleges violations of statutes, rules, or regulations, or from information contained in a peer review report received by the board.

(e) A firm issued a peer reviewed report with a rating of “fail,” as defined by the board in regulation, shall submit a copy of that report to the board. The board shall establish in regulation the time period that a firm must submit the report to the board. This period shall not exceed 60 days from the time the report is accepted by a board-recognized peer review program provider to the date the report is submitted to the board.

(f) (1) A board-recognized peer review program provider shall file a copy with the board of all peer review reports issued to California-licensed firms with a rating of “fail.” The board shall
 establish in regulation the time period that a board-recognized peer review program provider shall file the report with the board. This period shall not exceed 60 days from the time the report is accepted by a board-recognized peer review program provider to the date the report is filed with the board. These reports may be filed with the board electronically.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall require a board-recognized peer review program provider, when administering peer reviews in another state, to violate the laws of that state.

(g) The board shall define a peer review report rating of “fail” in regulation.

(h) Any requirements imposed by a board-recognized peer review program on a firm in conjunction with the completion of a peer review shall be separate from, and in addition to, any action by the board
 pursuant to this section.

(i) Any peer review report with a rating of “fail” submitted to the board in conjunction with this section shall be collected for investigatory purposes.

(j) Nothing in this section affects the discovery or admissibility of evidence in a civil or criminal action.

(k) Nothing in this section requires any firm to become a member of any professional organization.

(l) A peer reviewer shall not disclose information concerning licensees or their clients obtained during a peer review, unless specifically authorized pursuant to this section, Section 5076.1, or regulations prescribed by the board.

(m) A board-recognized peer review program provider shall utilize a secure web-based application, such as Facilitated State Board Access, to provide the board with objective information and data relating to the progress, participation, and results of a peer review, including peer review reports, peer review status, and correspondence between the board-recognized peer review provider and the firm.

(1) Firms shall participate in the secure web-based application utilized by the board-recognized peer review provider.

(2) Firms shall authorize the board access to the secure web-based application and authorize the board-recognized peer review program provider to
 comply with this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 586, Sec. 10.   (AB 3251)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5076.1.

(a) The board shall appoint a peer review oversight committee of certified public accountants of this state who maintain a license in good standing and who are authorized to practice public accountancy to provide recommendations to the board on any matter upon which it is authorized to act to ensure the effectiveness of mandatory peer review.

(b) The committee may request any information from a board-recognized peer review program provider deemed necessary to ensure the provider is administering peer reviews in accordance with the standards adopted by the board in regulations. Failure of a board-recognized peer review program provider to respond to the committee shall result in referral by the committee of the provider to the board for further action. Any information obtained by the board, its representatives, or the peer review oversight committee in conjunction with its review of peer review program providers shall not be a public record, and shall be exempt from public disclosure, provided, however, this information may be disclosed under any of the following circumstances:

(1) In connection with disciplinary proceedings of the board.

(2) In connection with legal proceedings in which the board is a
 party.

(3) In response to an official inquiry by a federal or state governmental regulatory agency.

(4) In compliance with a subpoena or summons enforceable by court order.

(5) As otherwise specifically required by law.

(c) The members of the committee shall be appointed to two-year terms and may serve a maximum of four consecutive terms.

(d) The board may adopt, as necessary, regulations further defining the minimum qualifications for appointment as a committee member and additional administrative elements designed to ensure the effectiveness of mandatory peer review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 448, Sec. 9.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5078.

In each office of a certified public accountant or public accountant in this state which is not under the personal management of such an accountant, respectively, work shall be supervised by a certified public accountant or public accountant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------

5079.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any firm lawfully engaged in the practice of public accountancy in this state may have owners who are not licensed as certified public accountants or public accountants if the following conditions are met:

(1) Nonlicensee owners shall be natural persons or entities, such as partnerships, professional corporations, or others, provided that each ultimate beneficial owner of an equity interest in that entity shall be a natural person materially participating in the business conducted by the firm or an entity controlled by the firm.

(2) Nonlicensee owners shall materially participate in the business of the firm, or an entity controlled by the firm, and their ownership interest shall revert to the firm upon the cessation of any material participation.

(3) Licensees shall in the aggregate, directly or beneficially, comprise a majority of owners, except that firms with two owners may have one owner who is a nonlicensee.

(4) Licensees shall in the aggregate, directly or beneficially, hold more than half of the equity capital and possess majority voting rights.

(5) Nonlicensee owners shall not hold themselves out as certified public accountants or public accountants and each licensed firm shall disclose actual or potential involvement of
 nonlicensee owners in the services provided.

(6) There shall be a certified public accountant or public accountant who has ultimate responsibility for each financial statement attest and compilation service engagement.

(7) Except as permitted by the board in the exercise of its discretion, a person may not become a nonlicensee owner or remain a nonlicensee owner if the person has done either of the following:

(A) Been convicted of any crime, an element of which is dishonesty or fraud, under the laws of any state, of the United States, or of any other jurisdiction.

(B) Had a professional license or the right to practice revoked or suspended for reasons other
 than nonpayment of dues or fees, or has voluntarily surrendered a license or right to practice with disciplinary charges or a disciplinary investigation pending, and not reinstated by a licensing or regulatory agency of any state, or of the United States, including, but not limited to, the Securities and Exchange Commission or Public Company Accounting Oversight Board, or of any other jurisdiction.

(b) (1) A nonlicensee owner of a licensed firm shall report to the board in writing of the occurrence of any of the events set forth in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) within 30 days of the date the nonlicensee owner has knowledge of the event. A conviction includes the initial plea, verdict, or finding of guilt, pleas of no contest, or pronouncement of sentence by a trial court even though that conviction may not be final or
 sentence actually imposed until appeals are exhausted.

(2) A California nonlicensee owner of a licensed firm shall report to the board in writing the occurrence of any of the following events occurring on or after January 1, 2006, within 30 days of the date the California nonlicensee owner has knowledge of the events:

(A) Any notice of the opening or initiation of a formal investigation of the nonlicensee owner by the Securities and Exchange Commission or its designee, or any notice from the Securities and Exchange Commission to a nonlicensee owner requesting a Wells submission.
